Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3886
Duties at inception of trusteeship.

Within a reasonable time after accepting a trusteeship or receiving trust assets, a trustee shall review the trust assets and make and implement decisions concerning the retention and disposition of assets, in order to bring the trust portfolio into compliance with the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust, and with the requirements of the prudent investor rule set forth in sections 30-3883 to 30-3889.

Laws 1997, LB 54, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 8-2205;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 86.